Tennessee statutes. Title 61 Partnerships
Part 10

Foreign Limited Partnerships

61-3-1001. Governing law.

Subject to the Constitution of Tennessee:

The law of the jurisdiction of formation of a foreign limited partnership governs:

The organization and internal affairs of the foreign limited partnership;

The liability of a partner as partner for a debt, obligation, or other liability of the foreign limited partnership; and

The liability of a series of the foreign limited partnership;

A foreign limited partnership is not precluded from registering to do business in this state because of any difference between the law of the foreign limited partnership's jurisdiction of formation and the law of this state.

Registration of a foreign limited partnership to do business in this state does not authorize the foreign partnership to engage in any activities and affairs or exercise any power that a limited partnership may not engage in or exercise in this state.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-1002. Registration to do business in this state.

A foreign limited partnership shall not do business in this state until the foreign limited partnership registers with the secretary of state under this part.

A foreign limited partnership doing business in this state shall not maintain an action or proceeding in this state unless the foreign limited partnership is registered to do business in this state and has paid to this state all fees for the years or parts thereof during which the foreign limited partnership did business in this state without having registered.

The failure of a foreign limited partnership to register to do business in this state does not impair the validity of a contract or act of the foreign limited partnership or preclude the foreign limited partnership from defending an action or proceeding in this state.

A limitation on the liability of a general partner or limited partner of a foreign limited partnership is not waived solely because the foreign limited partnership does business in this state without registering to do business in this state.

Section 61-3-1001(a) and (b) applies even if the foreign limited partnership fails to register under this part.

Any foreign limited partnership doing business in this state without first having registered shall be fined and shall pay to the secretary of state three (3) times the otherwise required filing fees for each year or part thereof during which the foreign limited partnership failed to register in this state.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-1003. Registration.

To register to do business in this state, a foreign limited partnership must submit to the secretary of state:

An original copy executed by a general partner of an application for registration as a foreign limited partnership, setting forth:

The name of the foreign limited partnership and, if different, the name under which the foreign limited partnership proposes to register and do business in this state;

The jurisdiction where organized, the date of the foreign limited partnership's organization and a statement from a general partner that, as of the date of filing, the foreign limited partnership validly exists as a limited partnership under the laws of the jurisdiction of the foreign limited partnership's organization;

The street address and zip code of the foreign limited partnership's registered office in this state, and a mailing address such as a post office box if the United States postal service does not deliver to the principal office; the county in which that office is located; and the name of the foreign limited partnership's registered agent at that office;

The street address, including the zip code, of the foreign limited partnership's principal office, and a mailing address such as a post office box if the United States postal service does not deliver to the principal office;

The name and business, residence, or mailing address and zip code of each of the general partners;

The date on which the foreign limited partnership first did, or intends to do, business in this state; and

Any additional information required by the secretary of state;

With the completed application, a certificate of existence, or a document of similar import, duly authenticated by the secretary of state or other official having custody of limited partnership records in the jurisdiction under whose law it is formed. The certificate must not bear a date of more than two (2) months prior to the date the application is filed in this state; and

A fee as set forth in § 61-3-1205.

If the secretary of state determines upon registration that a foreign limited partnership has been doing business in this state for a period of one (1) year or more prior to applying for registration, then the secretary of state must not file the registration until the foreign limited partnership submits a letter of good standing from the department of revenue.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1; 2018, ch. 575, § 13; 2020, ch. 719, § 33.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment substituted “letter of good standing from the department of revenue” for “confirmation of good standing” at the end of (b).

The 2020 amendment deleted “and” from the end of (a)(1)(E); added “and” to the end of (a)(1)(F); and added (a)(1)(G).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 575, § 42. March 16, 2018.

Acts 2020, ch. 719, § 35, June 22, 2020.

61-3-1004. Amendment of foreign registration.

If any statement required by § 61-3-1003 in the application for registration of a foreign limited partnership was false when made or any matter described in the application for registration has changed, making the application false, the foreign limited partnership must promptly file with the secretary of state an application for an amended registration of a foreign limited partnership. Notwithstanding the preceding sentence, a change in the foreign limited partnership's registered agent or registered office can be made by filing a statement of change as provided in § 61-3-116. Nothing in this chapter requires an amended registration if the only change in the certificate of foreign limited partnership is related to the admission or substitution of limited partners.

The requirements of § 61-3-1003 for obtaining an original registration of a foreign limited partnership apply to obtaining an amended registration under this section.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-1005. Activities not constituting doing business.

Activities of a foreign limited partnership that do not constitute doing business in this state under this part include:

Maintaining, defending, or settling any proceeding, claim, or dispute;

Holding meetings of the foreign limited partnership's partners or representatives, or carrying on any other activities concerning the foreign limited partnership's internal affairs;

Maintaining bank accounts;

Maintaining offices or agencies for the transfer, exchange and registration of the foreign limited partnership's own securities, or appointing and maintaining trustees or depositories with respect to those securities;

Selling through independent contractors;

Soliciting or obtaining orders, whether by mail or through representatives or otherwise, if the orders require acceptance outside of this state before the orders become contracts;

Creating or acquiring indebtedness, deeds of trust, mortgages, and security interests in real or personal property;

Securing or collecting debts or enforcing mortgages, deeds of trust, and security interests in property securing the debts;

Owning, without more, real or personal property. However, for a reasonable time, the management and rental of real property acquired in connection with enforcing a mortgage or deed of trust is also not considered transacting business, if the owner is attempting to liquidate the investment, and if no office or other agency for the office, other than an independent agency, is maintained in this state;

Conducting an isolated transaction that is completed within one (1) month and that is not a transaction in the course of repeated transactions of a like nature; or

Transacting business in interstate commerce.

A person does not do business in this state solely by being a partner of a foreign limited partnership that does business in this state.

The enumeration of activities in subsections (a) and (b) is not exhaustive, and is applicable solely to determine whether a foreign limited partnership is required to register and for no other purpose. This section does not apply in determining the contacts or activities that may subject a foreign limited partnership to service of process, taxation, or regulation under the law of this state other than this chapter.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-1006. Noncomplying name of foreign limited partnership.

A foreign limited partnership whose name does not comply with § 61-3-112 shall not register to do business in this state until the foreign limited partnership adopts, for the purpose of doing business in this state, an alternate name that complies with § 61-3-112. After registering to do business in this state with an alternate name, a foreign limited partnership shall do business in this state under:

The alternate name; or

The foreign limited partnership's name, with the addition of the foreign limited partnership's jurisdiction of formation.

If a registered foreign limited partnership changes its name to one that does not comply with § 61-3-112, the foreign limited partnership must not do business in this state until it complies with subsection (a) by amending its registration to adopt an alternate name that complies with § 61-3-112.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-1007. Withdrawal deemed on conversion to domestic filing entity or domestic limited liability partnership.

A registered foreign limited partnership that converts to a domestic limited liability partnership or to a domestic entity whose formation requires delivery of a record to the secretary of state for filing is deemed to have withdrawn its registration on the effective date of the conversion.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-1008. Transfer of registration.

When a registered foreign limited partnership has merged into a foreign entity that is not registered to do business in this state or has converted to a foreign entity required to register with the secretary of state to do business in this state, the foreign entity shall deliver to the secretary of state for filing an application for transfer of registration. The application must state:

The name of the registered foreign limited partnership before the merger or conversion;

That, before the merger or conversion, the registration pertained to a foreign limited partnership;

The name of the applicant foreign entity into which the foreign limited partnership has merged or to which it has been converted and, if the name does not comply with § 61-3-112, an alternate name adopted pursuant to § 61-3-1006(a);

The type of entity of the applicant foreign entity, its jurisdiction of formation, the date of its formation, its duration (if other than perpetual), and the date its fiscal year closes;

The street addresses, including zip code, of the principal office of the applicant foreign entity and if the law of the entity's jurisdiction of formation requires the entity to maintain an office in that jurisdiction, the street address of that office;

The name and street address, including zip code, of the applicant foreign entity's registered agent in this state;

If the United States postal service does not deliver mail to any of the street addresses listed in the application, a mailing address, including zip code, to which mail may be delivered;

The date the applicant foreign entity commenced doing business in this state;

If the applicant foreign entity is a limited liability company:

Whether it is manager managed, member managed, director managed, or board managed;

If it has more than six (6) members at the date of the filing of the application, the number of members of the limited liability company at the date of the filing of the application; and

If § 48-249-309(i) is applicable to the foreign limited liability company, the information required by § 48-249-309(i);

If the applicant foreign entity is a corporation:

The name and address, including city, state, and zip code, of each of its current officers;

The name and address, including city, state, and zip code, of each of its current directors;

A statement that it is (or is not, as the case may be) a corporation for profit; and

Any additional designation, such as bank, captive insurance company, credit union, for-profit benefit corporation, insurance company, litigation financier, Massachusetts trust, professional corporation, or trust company;

If the applicant foreign entity is a limited partnership, the name and address, including city, state, and zip code, of each of its current general partners; and

If the application is not to become effective immediately upon filing, the date (not later than ninety (90) days after the date of filing) and time the application is to become effective.

The applicant foreign entity shall deliver with the completed application a certificate of existence, or document of similar import, duly authenticated by the secretary of state or other official having custody of business entity records in the jurisdiction of the applicant foreign entity's formation. The certificate shall not bear a date more than two (2) months prior to the date the application is filed in this state.

If the applicant foreign entity is a limited liability company that elects to be registered as an obligated member entity pursuant to § 48-217-101(f), the application must:

State that the limited liability company elects to be registered as an obligated member entity;

State the effective date of this registration;

State that the signer understands that this election will cause the members of the limited liability company to become liable for the debts, obligations, and liabilities of the limited liability company to the same extent as a partner of a general partnership; and

Be accompanied by an obligated member addendum in the form prescribed by the secretary of state and signed by each person or entity that is a member of the limited liability company at the date of the filing of the application.

If the secretary of state determines upon application that the applicant foreign entity has been transacting business in this state without a certificate of authority for a period of one (1) year or more, then the secretary of state shall not file the application until the applicant foreign entity submits a letter of good standing from the department of revenue.

When an application for transfer of registration takes effect, the registration of the foreign limited partnership to do business in this state is transferred without interruption to the foreign entity into which the partnership has merged or to which it has been converted.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1; 2018, ch. 575, §§ 14-18.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment substituted “shall deliver” for “must deliver” in the first sentence of the introductory paragraph of (a); rewrote (a)(4), which read “The type of entity of the applicant foreign entity and the foreign entity’s jurisdiction of formation”; added (a)(8)–(a)(12); redesignated former (b) as present (e); and added present (b)–(d).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 575, § 42. March 16, 2018.

61-3-1009. Revocation of registration.

The secretary of state may commence a proceeding under subsection (b) to administratively revoke the registration of a registered foreign limited partnership authorized to transact business in this state, if:

The foreign limited partnership does not deliver its annual report to the secretary of state within two (2) months after the report is due;

The foreign limited partnership is without a registered agent or registered office in this state for two (2) months or more;

The foreign limited partnership does not inform the secretary of state, under § 61-3-116 or § 61-3-117, that the foreign limited partnership's registered agent or registered office has changed, that the foreign limited partnership's registered agent has resigned, or that the foreign limited partnership's registered office has been discontinued, within two (2) months of the change, resignation, or discontinuance;

The name of the foreign limited partnership contained in a document filed pursuant to this chapter fails to comply with § 61-3-1006;

A general partner or representative of the foreign limited partnership signed a document the person knew was false in any material respect, with the intent that the document be delivered to the secretary of state for filing;

The secretary of state receives a duly authenticated certificate from the secretary of state or other official having custody of the foreign limited partnership's records in the jurisdiction under the laws of which the foreign limited partnership is formed, stating that the foreign limited partnership has been terminated, or has been a constituent party to a merger and was not the surviving entity of the merger;

The foreign limited partnership is exceeding the authority conferred upon it by this part; or

The foreign limited partnership submits to the secretary of state a check, bank draft, money order, or other instrument for payment of any fee, and the instrument is dishonored upon presentation for payment.

If the secretary of state determines that one (1) or more grounds exist under subsection (a) for revocation of a registration, the secretary of state must serve the foreign limited partnership with written communication of the secretary of state's determination, except that the determination may be sent by first class mail. If the grounds for revocation are pursuant to subdivision (a)(6), notice need not be sent, and a certificate of revocation may be sent without the two-month waiting period required by subdivision (b)(2).

If the foreign limited partnership does not correct each ground for administrative revocation, or demonstrate to the reasonable satisfaction of the secretary of state that each ground determined by the secretary of state does not exist, within two (2) months after service of the communication of the determination, the secretary of state may revoke the foreign limited partnership's registration by signing a certificate of revocation that recites the ground or grounds for revocation and the revocation's effective date. The secretary of state shall file the original of the certificate and shall serve a copy on the foreign limited partnership, except that the copy of the certificate may be sent by first class mail.

The authority of a foreign limited partnership to transact business in this state ceases on the date shown on the certificate revoking the foreign limited partnership's registration.

The secretary of state's revocation of a foreign limited partnership's registration appoints the secretary of state as the foreign limited partnership's agent for service of process in any proceeding based on a cause of action that arose during the time the foreign limited partnership was authorized to transact business in this state. Service of process on the secretary of state under this subdivision (b)(4) is service on the foreign limited partnership.

The administrative revocation of a foreign limited partnership's registration does not terminate the designation or authority of the registered agent or registered office of the limited partnership.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-1010. Reinstatement of foreign limited partnership.

If the registration of a foreign limited partnership is administratively revoked pursuant to § 61-3-1009, the partnership may apply to the secretary of state for reinstatement following the administrative revocation. The application must:

[Deleted by 2018 amendment.]

State the name of the foreign limited partnership at the time of the revocation of the foreign limited partnership's registration;

State a name for the limited partnership that satisfies § 61-3-112; and

State that the grounds for revocation of the foreign limited partnership's registration did not exist or have been eliminated.

If the secretary of state determines that the application is accompanied by a confirmation of good standing with the department of revenue and contains the information required by subsection (a), and that the information is correct, then the secretary of state must cancel the certificate of revocation and prepare a certificate of reinstatement that recites the secretary of state's determination and the effective date of reinstatement, file the original of the certificate, and serve a copy on the foreign limited partnership. Service of the copy may be made by first class mail.

If the foreign limited partnership name in subdivision (a)(2) is different than the foreign limited partnership name in subdivision (a)(3), the application for reinstatement must constitute an amendment to the registration insofar as it pertains to the foreign limited partnership's name.

When reinstatement is effective, reinstatement relates back to and takes effect as of the effective date of the administrative dissolution, and the foreign limited partnership resumes carrying on its business as if the administrative dissolution had never occurred.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1; 2018, ch. 575, §§ 19, 20.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment deleted former (a)(1) which read: “Be accompanied by a certificate of existence, or a document of similar import, duly authenticated by the secretary of state or other official having custody of foreign limited partnership’s records in the jurisdiction under whose law the foreign limited partnership is formed and bearing a date of no more than two (2) months prior to the date the application is filed in this state;” and substituted “confirmation of good standing with the department of revenue” for “the required certificate of existence or corresponding document” in the first sentence of (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 575, § 42. March 16, 2018.

61-3-1011. Judicial review of denial of reinstatement of foreign limited partnership.

If the secretary of state denies a foreign limited partnership's application for reinstatement following revocation of its registration, the secretary of state must serve the foreign limited partnership with a notice in a record that explains the reasons for the denial.

A foreign limited partnership may seek judicial review of a denial of reinstatement in the chancery court of Davidson County not later than thirty (30) days after service of the notice of denial.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-1012. Cancellation of registration.

A registered foreign limited partnership may cancel its registration by filing with the secretary of state a certificate of cancellation of registration accompanied by a confirmation of good standing with the department of revenue. The certificate of cancellation must state:

The current name of the foreign limited partnership, and if different, the name under which it transacts business in this state;

The name of the jurisdiction under the laws of which the foreign limited partnership is formed;

That the foreign limited partnership is not doing business in this state and that it withdraws its registration to do business in this state;

That foreign limited partnership either continues its registered agent in this state, or revokes the authority of its registered agent to accept service on its behalf in this state;

A mailing address to which service of process may be made under subsection (b); and

A commitment to notify the secretary of state in the future of any change in the mailing address set forth under subdivision (a)(5).

After the withdrawal of the registration of a foreign limited partnership, service of process in any action or proceeding based on a cause of action arising during the time the foreign limited partnership was registered to do business in this state may be made pursuant to § 61-3-119.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1; 2018, ch. 575, § 21.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment rewrote (a) which read: “(a) A registered foreign limited partnership may cancel its registration by filing with the secretary of state a certificate of cancellation of registration stating:“(1) The name of the foreign limited partnership and its jurisdiction of formation;“(2) That the foreign limited partnership is not doing business in this state and that it withdraws its registration to do business in this state;“(3) That the foreign limited partnership revokes the authority of its registered agent to accept service on its behalf in this state; and“(4) An address to which service of process may be made under subsection (b).”

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 575, § 42. March 16, 2018.

61-3-1013. Enjoining from doing business.

The attorney general and reporter may maintain an action by complaint in the chancery court of any county in which a foreign limited partnership is transacting any business in this state to enjoin a foreign limited partnership from doing business in this state in violation of this part.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-1014. Cancellation of registration following administrative revocation.

When a foreign limited partnership that has had its registration revoked desires to cancel its registration it may do so without first being reinstated by filing with the secretary of state a certificate of cancellation of registration following administrative revocation of registration accompanied by a confirmation of good standing by the department of revenue. The certificate of cancellation of certificate of registration must set forth:

The current name of the foreign limited partnership and, if different, the name under which the foreign limited partnership transacts business in this state; the date of revocation of foreign limited partnership registration; and the name of the jurisdiction under the laws of which the foreign limited partnership is formed;

That the foreign limited partnership is not transacting business in this state and that it surrenders its authority to transact business in this state;

That the foreign limited partnership either continues its registered agent in this state, or revokes the authority of its registered agent to accept service on its behalf and appoints the secretary of state as its agent for service of process in any proceeding based on a cause of action arising during the time it was authorized to transact business in this state;

A mailing address to which the secretary of state may mail a copy of any process served on the secretary of state under subdivision (a)(3); and

A commitment to notify the secretary of state in the future of any change in the mailing address set forth under subdivision (a)(4).

After cancellation of the registration of the foreign limited partnership, service of process on the secretary of state or the continued registered agent under this section is service on the foreign limited partnership. Upon receipt of process, the secretary of state shall comply with § 61-3-121. However, the mailing address set forth under subdivision (a)(4), as it may be changed under subdivision (a)(5), shall be deemed to be the principal executive office of the foreign limited partnership, for purposes of the compliance with § 61-3-121 by the secretary of state.

Acts 2018, ch. 575, § 22.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 575, § 42. March 16, 2018.